Hawaii statutes.
§279A-2 Statewide transportation plan.
(a) The state department of transportation shall prepare a new statewide
transportation plan and shall submit said plan to the legislature in its 1978
session. The legislature shall adopt the plan by resolution. The plan shall
be directed toward the ultimate development of a balanced, multi-modal
statewide transportation system that serves clearly identified social,
economic, and environmental objectives. The statewide transportation plan
shall include the following system components:

(1) The national system of interstate and defense
highways, and highways within the state highway system;

(2) Airports;

(3) Harbors and water-borne transit;

(4) Surface mass transit systems; and

(5) Major county roads.

The department of transportation shall pay
particular attention to the interfacing of the various modes of transportation.

(b) The statewide transportation plan shall:

(1) Include projected transportation needs for a
six-year period and a schedule of priorities for the construction,
modification, and maintenance of various segments of the statewide plan that
involve either state-operated systems or county-operated systems that may
require state financial assistance for a twenty-year period; and

(2) Comply with county transportation-related plans;
county general plans; and all community, development, or community development
plans adopted pursuant to the county general plan, to the extent that
compliance does not affect the receipt of federal funds.

(c) Both the six-year and twenty-year
estimates shall be updated annually. [L 1975, c 179, §2; am L 2009, c 27, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next